District of Columbia statutes.
38-752.03

Post-secondary preparation plan.

(a)

(1)

Beginning with the graduating class of 2014, the Mayor shall ensure that each public high school student applies to at least one post-secondary institution before graduation.

(2)

The Mayor shall ensure that each public high school student participates in a program designed to provide students with information on applying to an appropriate post-secondary institution, including information on financial aid and other resources necessary to streamline a transition to a post-secondary institution. The program may include school-based and non-school-based resources.

(b)

The Mayor shall issue a report that details the number of students that attend a post-secondary institution, including the number of students who attend each type, including:

(1)

Universities;

(2)

Colleges;

(3)

Vocational schools; and

(4)

Other post-secondary institutions.

(c)

Beginning with the graduating class of 2014, the Mayor shall require that each student attending public high school takes the SAT or the American College Testing program before graduation.

(d)

The Mayor may exempt a student from the requirements of subsections (a)(1) and (c) of this section, if the Mayor determines that it would constitute an undue hardship on the student.

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 203, 59 DCR 3642